Utah statutes.
58-76-301.   License required -- License classification.
(1)  After January 1, 2003, a license is required to engage in the practice of
geology before the public except as specifically provided in Sections 58-1-307
and 58-76-304.
(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under the provisions
of this chapter a license in the classification of professional geologist.
